Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Fish Division.............................  $ 24,098,459
(2) Wildlife Division........................  $ 6,159,262
(3) Administrative Services
Division.....................................  $ 8,141,668
(4) Debt service ..............................  $ 2,496,250
(5) Capital improvement.................  $ 169,181
(6) State Police enforcement .......... $ 2,853,401
(7) Habitat Division ........................ $ 20,237,193
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding federal funds from  the Pacific Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected or received  by the State De-
partment of Fish and Wildlife, for the following purposes:
(1) Fish Division ............................. $ 87,587,702
(2) Wildlife Division........................ $ 43,415,588
(3) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 55,750,447
(4) Capital improvement................. $ 6,590,855
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 1,833,610
(6) State Police enforcement .......... $ 31,373,062
(7) Habitat Division ........................ $ 26,266,545
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from lottery moneys  allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to
the State Department of  Fish and Wildlife, for activities and projects to implement Article
XV, section 4 (8), of the Oregon Constitution, for the following purposes:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5509 (SB 5509-A) Page 1
(1) Fish Division............................. $ 5,351,561
(2) Wildlife Division........................ $ 1,461,960
(3) Habitat Division........................ $ 4,846
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described in section 2 of this 2023  Act col-
lected or received by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the following purposes:
(1) Fish Division ............................. $122,463,324
(2) Wildlife Division........................ $ 50,416,713
(3) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 8,863,221
(4) Capital improvement................. $ 3,489,212
(5) Habitat Division ........................ $ 28,270,217
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5509 (SB 5509-A) Page 2